Hawaii, session 2025, GM1316.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 383-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending the definition of "registered for work" or
"registration for work" to read as follows:
""Registered for work" or "registration for work" means
that an individual shall provide information to the [omploymont
office to be posted—e>ft--thc depar-tment' o intornot job-matching
sys-tefib—including the individual's name,—job s-k-jrlls/—eduea-biefb-
fe'gaifting ?—ef«p4-eymeftt—and—deties-;—erred
working conditions/—oe-eupational lie-en&es,—aftd-edder—reievaftt-
eecupatirenal information] department to facilitate work search
efforts by the individual and increase job referrals by the
employment office."
SECTION 2. Section 383-29, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending subsection (a) to read:
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx

Page 2
H.B. NO.
"(a) An unemployed individual shall be eligible to receive
benefits with respect to any week only if the department finds
that:
(1) The individual has made a claim for benefits with
respect to that week in accordance with rules the
department may prescribe and with section 383-29.7 for
partially unemployed individuals;
(2) The individual has registered for work, as defined in
section 383-1, and thereafter continued to report, at
an employment office in accordance with rules the
department may prescribe, or such other place as the
department may approve, except that the department [7-
by■rule,] may waive or alter either or both of the
requirements of this paragraph for [partially]£
JAL Partially unemployed individuals pursuant to
section 383-29.8 [7—individuals]2.
(B) Individuals attached to regular jobs[7—and
ethe^?] £
(C) Union members in good standing being referred to
jobs through the labor union job placement
service; provided that the labor union agrees to
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx 2
■HiiHinHiiininMii

Page 3 S
H.B. NO. j
S.D. 2
report to the department all individuals who
refuse job referrals or offers of work and all
individuals not ready, willing, and able to work,
and the labor union is approved by the department
f£r tb^pu££ose of wajjzjni2 work reglst^a ti2n2.
(D) Individuals involved in a labor dispute and for
whom an employer-employee relationship continues
to exist;
Individuals who are suspended from work and for
whom an employer-employee relationship continues
to exist; provided that the waiver shall apply
only to the period of suspension but shall not
exceed four consecutive weeks of unemployment
immediately following the week in which the
individual was suspended; or
(F) Other types of cases or situations [with rcspecte-
fee which it] in which the department finds that
compliance with those requirements would be
oppressive, or would be inconsistent with the
purpose of this chapter; [provided that r©—rule
eball conf liofe—w4-th section—-38-3—21; ]
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx
■MniHiMinniiiiiiigi

Page 4
H.B. NO.
(3) The individual is able to work, and is available for
work; provided that no claimant shall be considered
ineligible with respect to any week of unemployment
for failure to comply with this paragraph if the
failure is due to an illness or disability, as
evidenced by a physician’s certificate, which occurs
during an uninterrupted period of unemployment with
respect to which benefits are claimed and no work
[which] that would have been suitable be]
before the beginning of the illness [and] or
disability has been offered the claimant;
(4) The individual has been unemployed for a waiting
period of one week within the individual's benefit
year[-;-- He] ; provided that no week shall be counted as
a waiting period[-i-
-- 14] if benefits have been paid with respect
thereto [7-
-- dftieee] unless the individual was eligible for
benefits with respect thereto as provided in this
section and section 383-30, except for the
requirements of this paragraph;
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx

Page 5
H.B. NO.
(5) In the case of an individual whose benefit year
begins[+
(A) On or after January 2,—1966/—befe—fee—©etefee^
I77—1-999,—the- indiv-i-dttal has had during the
individual-’e base period a total of -fourteen or
more weeks of employment,—as-- defined in oootion
383-1-/—and has boon pa-ld—weges-f-or insured work
during the—individ-ue-l-^--3---baoo- period in an amount
equal to at least tb-i-rfey-times the indivi-dual' s
weekly benefit amount as—determined under oeetion
3&-3—2-2 (-b) .-- For the -pur-pesos- of this
eubparagraph,—wages for- insured work shall
ineludo wages-paid for sorvioosi
-{-H- Which -wore not employment,—as defined in
seefe4-eft—39-3—2-/—er—pursuant fee—an--election
under oootion 39-3—33—prier—fee—January 1/
■i978,—a-fe—any-time during—the ono-yoar period
ending December 31/—1975;—and
(ii) Which are agricultural-.labor-/—as defined in
-seefe-ien—39-3—9 except sor-v-ice excluded—under
section—[-383--7-(a-) (1) ]■>—or are domestic
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx
MMIliilllllllHIII

Page 6
H.B. NO.
s-eevi-ee—
sccte-ion—[383-7 (q) (2) ] ;—oxcopt to the extent
that aosistanco under title—LI- of the
g-incrgeney Jobs and- Unomplo-ymcnt Aooiotanoo
Act of 1974 wee—paid-on the booio of—these
SGr-vi-eea-;-
-(-Bh- On and—a^te-r—©ebebee—1-?—1989,—te—©enee-ey—4-7—1992,
-the—individual haa been—efitpleycd,—es—defined in
oection 383-2,—and hao been paid wages—fen
insur-ed work during the indi-v-idual' a base period
in an amount equal—to not loos than thirty ■■■fe-inteo
bbe—ifi’dividual' o weekly benefit amount,—as
determi-ned ■■under- -Dcction 3B3—22(b),—and tho
individaa-1—hao been paid wages for inoured work
during—at—least two quarfers-of tho individual's
base-period-; -pr-ev-ided -that no obhenwise eligible
individual who established a prior benefit year
under thio chapter or the- unemployment
compensation -lew—ef—any--ether- state,—shall be
e-bigibie—be—reeeirve—benefibs—in—a—ouccooding
benefit year until,—during tho period following
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx 6

Page 7 H.B. NO. S’
■feho bogi-ening of tho prie-r bonofit yoor,—that
individue-1 worked-in cove-red-employinGnt for which
wages wc-re -paid i-n on amount cquo-1 to—a-fe—least
41ve-times the week-ly benefit-amount established
f^H^--that individaal in- the succeeding benefit
year;—aed
-CGj- After] after January 4, 1992, the individual has
been employed, as defined in section 383-2, and has
been paid wages for insured work during the
individual's base period in an amount equal to not
less than twenty-six times the individual’s weekly
benefit amount, as determined under section 383-22 (b),
and the individual has been paid wages for insured
work during at least two quarters of the individual's
base period; provided that no otherwise eligible
individual who established a prior benefit year under
this chapter or the unemployment compensation law of
any other state, shall be eligible to receive benefits
in a succeeding benefit year until, during the period
following the beginning of the prior benefit year,
that individual worked in covered employment for which
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx
iiiiiiinmiiRMiiii

Page 8
H.B. NO.
s.D. 2
wages were paid in an amount equal to at least five
times the weekly benefit amount established for that
individual in the succeeding benefit year.
For purposes of this paragraph, wages and weeks
of employment shall be counted for benefit purposes
with respect to any benefit year only if the benefit
year begins subsequent to the dates on which the
employing unit by which the wages or other
remuneration, as provided in the definition of weeks
of employment in section 383-1, were paid has
satisfied the conditions of section 383-1 with respect
to becoming an employer.
Effective for benefit years beginning January 1,
2004, and thereafter, if an individual fails to
establish a valid claim for unemployment insurance
benefits under this paragraph, the department shall
make a redetermination of entitlement based upon the
alternative base period, as defined in section 383-1;
provided further that the individual shall satisfy the
conditions of [ocction 383-29(a)(5)] this paragraph
that apply to claims filed using the base period, as
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx 8
IIIIIHIIIIinilMlllilHHII

Page 9
H.B. NO.
S.D. 2
defined in section 383-1, and the establishment of
claims using the alternative base period shall be
subject to the terms and conditions of sections 383-33
and 383-94; and
(6) Effective November 24, 1994, an individual who has
been referred to reemployment services pursuant to the
profiling system under section 383-92.5 shall
participate in those services or in similar services.
The individual may not be required to participate in
reemployment services if the department determines the
individual has completed those services, or there is
justifiable cause for the claimant's failure to
participate in those services.
For the purposes of this subsection, employment and wages
used to establish a benefit year shall not thereafter be reused
to establish another benefit year."
2. By amending subsection (e) to read:
"(e) Notwithstanding any provisions of this chapter to the
contrary, a claimant shall not be denied benefits because of the
claimant's regular attendance at a vocational training or
retraining course which the director has approved and continues
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx
■inwiiiiiiiiiiimiiii

Page 10
H.B. NO.
S.D. 2
from time to time to approve for the claimant. The director may
approve such course for a claimant only if:
(1) The training activity is authorized under [titlco 1/
l-t-T——and IV—(oxcopt"en-the-job training)—©f—the
Job Par-fenership ■T-rai-fbing -Act—(-P.-L-;—97-300) / ] the
Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, Public Law
113-128; or
(2) All of the following conditions apply:
(A) Reasonable employment opportunities for which the
claimant is fitted by training and experience do
not exist in the locality or are severely
curtailed;
(B) The training course relates to an occupation or
skill for which there are, or are expected to be
in the immediate future, reasonable employment
opportunities in the locality;
(C) The training course is offered by a competent and
reliable agency; and
(D) The claimant has the required qualifications and
aptitudes to complete the course successfully."
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx 10
iiiiHiiiinimiiiiiii

Page 11 H.B. NO. 55.1
S.D. 2
SECTION 3. Section 383-29.8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) An individual shall be exempted from the work search
requirements as determined by rules of the department, or be
subject to modified work search requirements as authorized by
the department if the individual is waived from the registration
for work requirements [7—a-s—de-fifted—tn——3r-r] under
section 383-29(a)."
SECTION 4. Section 383-36, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§383-36 Notice of determinations. Notice of a
determination or redetermination upon a claim shall be promptly
given to the claimant [7—by detivo-ry thereof or] by electronic
notification unless an election was made to receive notices by
mail, and in such case, by mailing the notice to the claimant's
last known address. In addition, notice of a determination or
redetermination with respect to the first week of a benefit year
shall be given to each employer by whom the claimant was
employed during the claimant's base period, and to the last
employing unit by whom the claimant was employed, and notice of
any determination or redetermination which involves the
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx 11

Page 12
H.B. NO. Joi
S.D. 2
application of section 383-30 shall be given to the last
employing unit by whom the claimant was employed, in every case
by [dGlivery -thorGof to -such party or] electronic notification
unless an election was made to receive notices by mail, and in
such case, by mailing the notice to the party's last known
address. The date of electronic notification shall be
equivalent to the mailing date."
SECTION 5. Section 383-38, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending subsections (a) and (b) to read:
"(a) The claimant or any other party entitled to notice of
a determination or redetermination as [heroin] provided in this
subsection may file an appeal from the determination or
redetermination at the office of the department in the county in
which the claimant resides or in the county in which the
claimant was last employed, or with a copy of the contested
determination at the employment security appeals referee's
office, within ten days after the date of mailing of the notice
to the claimant's or party's last known address, or if the
notice is not mailed, within ten days after the date of
[dei-ive^] the electronic notification of the notice to the
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx 1
llllilllHIiliilllllHII

Page 13
H.B. NO.
claimant or party. The department may for good cause extend the
period within which an appeal may be filed to thirty days. The
notice of a determination or redetermination shall be final and
shall be binding upon each party unless an appeal is filed by a
party pursuant to this subsection. Written notice of a hearing
of an appeal shall be sent by first class, nonregistered,
noncertified mail to the claimant's or party's last known
address at least twelve days [prior to] before the initial
hearing date[—] or by electronic notification.
(b) The appeal under subsection (a) shall be heard in the
county in which the appeal is filed, except that the department
may by its rules provide for the holding of a hearing in another
county with the consent of all parties or where necessary in
order that a fair and impartial hearing may be had, and may
provide for the taking of depositions. Unless the appeal is
withdrawn with the permission of the referee, the referee after
affording the parties reasonable opportunity for a fair hearing
shall make findings and conclusions and on the basis thereof
affirm, modify, or reverse such determination or
redetermination. The parties to any appeal shall be promptly
notified of the decision of the referee and shall be furnished
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx 13
ItlllllGlWriHlililUlli!

Page 14 H.B. NO. " i
with a copy of the decision and the findings and conclusions in
support thereof and the decisions shall be final and shall be
binding upon each party unless a proceeding for judicial review
is [initiated] filed by the party pursuant to section 383-41;
provided that within the time provided for taking an appeal and
[prior to] before the filing of a notice of appeal, the referee
may reopen the matter, upon the application of the director or
any other party, or upon the referee's own motion, and thereupon
may take further evidence or may modify or reverse the referee's
decision, findings, or conclusions. If the matter is reopened,
the referee shall render a further decision in the matter either
reaffirming or modifying or reversing the referee's original
decision, and notice shall be given thereof in the manner
hereinbefore provided. Upon reopening, the referee who heard
IS the original appeal shall reconsider the matter, except where
the referee is no longer employed as a referee or the referee
disqualifies oneself from reconsidering the referee's decision."
2. By amending subsections (d) and (e) to read:
"(d) If a claimant or party does not receive the written
notice under subsection (a), a second written notice shall be
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx 14

Page 15 477
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 2
sent by certified mail [7-] or by electronic notification, and the
hearing on the appeal shall be rescheduled accordingly.
(e) [Upon application to,—app^eva-l—feyv—the employment
security appeale-ro-fcree-^-o offiee,—a—be—as
appeal may clecfe-te rcce-ivc hearing noti-ees/—decisions,—and
other appeal documents from the -rofO'gee-'-s-effice in elcctronie
^e^ewab—ef—nebiee—by—mairl-: The date of electronic
b-ifaa&fftiss-ieft—is—eqaivaieftb—be—febe—Rtairl-i-ng—babe—pui^eses—ef-
bhis—section.] A claimant or party shall receive hearing
notices, decisions, and other appeal documents from the
referee’s office by electronic notification, unless an election
was made to receive notices, decisions, and other appeal
documents from the referee's office by mail, and in such case,
the notices, decisions, and other appeal documents shall be
mailed to the claimant's or party's last known address. The
date of electronic notification shall be equivalent to the
mailing date. Electronic notification status may be rescinded
at any time by the referee's office, claimant, or any party upon
written notification."
SECTION 6. Section 383-66, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx 15
■iiHHiiiiiiiinmgioiin

Page 16
H.B. NO. -1
"(a) The department, for the nine-month period April 1,
1941, to December 31, 1941, and for each calendar year
thereafter, except as otherwise provided in this part, shall
classify employers in accordance with their actual experience in
the payment of contributions and with respect to benefits
charged against their accounts with a view to fixing the
contribution rates to reflect this experience. The department
shall determine the contribution rate of each employer in
accordance with the following requirements:
(1) The standard rate of contributions payable by each
employer for any calendar year through 1984 shall be
three per cent. For calendar years 1985 and
thereafter, the standard rate of contributions payable
by each employer shall be five and four-tenths per
cent;
(2) No employer's rate for the calendar year 1942 and for
any calendar year thereafter shall be other than the
maximum rate unless and until the employer's account
has been chargeable with benefits throughout the
thirty-six consecutive calendar month period ending on
December 31 of the preceding calendar year, except
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx 16

Page 17
H.B. NO.
that, for the calendar year 1956 and for each calendar
year thereafter, an employer who has not been subject
to the law for a sufficient period to meet this
requirement may qualify for a rate other than the
maximum rate if the employer's account has been
chargeable throughout a lesser period but in no event
less than the twelve consecutive calendar month period
ending on December 31 of the preceding calendar year.
For the calendar years 1985 through 1991, the
contribution rate for a new or newly covered employer
shall be the sum of the employer's basic contribution
rate of three and six-tenths per cent and the fund
solvency contribution rate determined for that year
pursuant to section 383-68 (a), until the employer's
account has been chargeable with benefits throughout
the twelve consecutive calendar month period ending on
December 31 of the preceding calendar year; except
that no employer's contribution rate shall be greater
than five and four-tenths per cent and no employer
with a negative reserve ratio shall have a
contribution rate less than the employer's basic •
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx 17
MflllffllNIIMWIilllllM

Page 18
H.B. NO.
contribution rate. For calendar years 1992 and
thereafter, the contribution rate for a new or newly
covered employer shall be the contribution rate
assigned to any employer with .0000 reserve ratio,
until the employer's account has been chargeable with
benefits throughout the twelve consecutive calendar
month period ending on December 31 of the preceding
calendar year;
(3) Any amount credited to this State under section 903 of
the Social Security Act[—] of 1935, as amended, which
has been appropriated for expenses of administration,
whether or not withdrawn from the trust fund, shall be
excluded from the fund for the purposes of this
paragraph. Any advance that may be made to this State
under section 1201 of the Social Security Act[—] of
1935, whether or not withdrawn from this trust fund,
shall be excluded from the fund for the purposes of
this paragraph. No employer's rate shall be reduced
in any amount that is not allowable as an additional
credit, against the tax levied by the [-fedoral-]
Unemployment Tax Act pursuant to section 3302(b) of
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx 18
IHlIiMiraMHIMiliMn

Page 19
H.B. NO.
I the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
or pursuant to any other federal statute, successor to
section 3302(b), which provides for the additional
credit now provided for in section 3302(b);
(4) If, when any classification of employers is to be made
(which may be after the commencement of the period for
which the classification is to be made), the
department finds that any employer has failed to file
any report required in connection therewith or has
filed a report that the department finds incorrect or
insufficient, the department shall notify the employer
thereof by mail addressed to the employer's last known
address. Unless the employer files the report or a
corrected or sufficient report, as the case may be,
within fifteen days after the mailing of the notice,
the maximum rate of contributions shall be payable by
the employer for the period for which the contribution
rate is to be fixed. Effective January 1, 1987, the
director, for excusable failure, may redetermine the
assignment of the maximum contribution rate in
accordance with this section, provided the employer
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx 19
IliilllinillllllMIMIM

Page 20 H.B. NO. g-
files all reports as required by the department and
submits a written request for redetermination before
December 31 of the year for which the contribution
rate is to be fixed;
(5) For the purpose of sections 383-63 to 383-69, if after
December 31, 1939, any employing unit in any manner
succeeds to or acquires the organization, trade, or
business, or substantially all the assets thereof
(whether or not the successor or acquiring unit was an
"employing unit", as that term is defined in section
383-1 te] before the acquisition), or after
December 31, 1988 and before December 31,
1992, acquires a clearly identifiable and segregable
portion of the organization, trade, or business of
another that at the time of the acquisition was an
employer subject to this chapter, and the successor
continues or resumes the organization, trade, or
business and continues to employ all or nearly all of
the predecessor's employees, or the successor
continues or resumes the clearly identifiable and
segregable portion of the organization, trade, or
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx 20
■liiiMiiHiiimiii

Page 21
H.B. NO. E’
business and continues to employ all or nearly all of
the employees of the clearly identifiable and
segregable portion, an application may be made for
transfer of the predecessor's experience record. If
the predecessor employer has submitted all information
and reports required by the department including
amended quarterly wage reports identifying the
employees transferred or retained and executed and
filed with the department before December 31 of the
calendar year following the calendar year in which the
acquisition occurred on a form approved by the
department a waiver relinquishing the rights to all or
the clearly identifiable and segregable portion of the
predecessor's prior experience record with respect to
its separate account, actual contribution payment, and
benefit chargeability experience, annual payrolls and
other data for the purpose of obtaining a reduced
rate, and requesting the department to permit the
experience record to inure to the benefit of the
successor employing unit upon request of the successor
employing unit, the experience record for rate
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx
iiniiHiifliiiiiiiiMiiiiii

Page 22
H.B. NO.
computation purposes of the predecessor shall
thereupon be deemed the experience record of the
successor and the experience record shall be
transferred by the department to the successor
employing unit and shall become the separate account
of the employing unit as of the date of the
acquisition. Benefits chargeable to the predecessor
employer or successor employer in case of an
acquisition of a clearly identifiable and segregable
portion of the organization, trade, or business, after
the date of acquisition on account of employment
[p-r-i-o-r- -to] before the date of the acquisition shall be
charged to the separate account of the successor
employing unit. In case of an acquisition of a
clearly identifiable and segregable portion of the
organization, trade, or business, the experience
record that inures to the benefit of the successor
employer shall be determined as follows:
(A) Wages, as used in section 383-61, attributable to
the clearly identifiable and segregable portion
shall be for the period beginning with the most
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx 22

Page 23 "’
H.B. NO. h
recent three consecutive calendar years
immediately preceding the determination of rates
under sections 383-63 to 383-69 and through the
date of acquisition; and
(B) Reserve balance attributable to the clearly
identifiable and segregable portion shall be the
amount determined by dividing the wages, as used
in section 383-61, of the clearly identifiable
and segregable portion in the three calendar
years (or that lesser period as the clearly
identifiable and segregable portion may have been
in operation) immediately preceding the
computation date of the rating period
before which the acquisition occurred by the
total taxable payrolls of the predecessor for the
three-year period (or that lesser period as the
clearly identifiable and segregable portion may
have been in operation) and multiplying the
quotient by the reserve balance of the
predecessor employer calculated as of the
acquisition date;
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx 23
■■HinuDiunRiiiii

Page 24
H.B. NO.
provided that the waiver or waivers required herein
are filed with the department within sixty days after
the date of acquisition, the successor employing unit,
unless already an employer subject to this chapter,
shall be subject from the date of acquisition to the
rate of contribution of the predecessor or of two or
more predecessors if they have the same contribution
rate. If there are two or more predecessors having
different contribution rates, the successor shall be
subject to the rate prescribed for new or newly
covered employers under paragraph (2) until the next
determination of rates under sections 383-63 to
383-69, at which time the experience records of the
predecessors and successor shall be combined and shall
IS be deemed to be the experience record of a single
employing unit and the successor's rate shall
thereupon be determined upon the basis of the combined
experience. If the successor at the time of the
transfer is an employer subject to this chapter, the
rate of contribution to which the successor is then
subject shall remain the same until the next
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx 24

Page 25
H.B. NO.
determination of rates under sections 383-63 to
383-69, at which time the experience records of the
predecessor and successor shall be combined and shall
be deemed to be the experience record of a single
employing unit and the successor's rate shall
thereupon be determined upon the basis of the combined
experience. For the purpose of determination of rates
under sections 383-63 to 383-69 of all successor
employing units, waivers as required herein, if not
previously filed as hereinabove provided, shall be
filed with the department not later than March 1 of
the year for which the rate is determined; provided
that no waiver shall be accepted by the department for
filing unless the employing unit executing the waiver
has filed all reports and paid all contributions
required by this chapter;
[4-6-}- The-dc-partmont may pr-eocribe—j?ulco for tho
e&-t-ab-l-iahment—maintenanco,—a-nd-"dissolution of joint
accounts by two or more omployoro,——in■accordance
with the rules and upon appli-eation by two or—more
employers to ostablisht- ouch a-n account,—er—fee—ffte-ege
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx 25
iMninniMimiiiffliin

Page 26
H.B. NO.
■fehoir o-everal individual accounfeg in j joint account,
ohall maintain the—joint account ao—if it constituted
a—single employer 'o account- —rules—shall bo
consistent wi-feh—the federal requirements for
additional credit allowance in section—3-3&-3—e-f-the-
federal—Internal Revenue Code and ecn&ic-feeftt—with—th-i-
ohapte^r-;-
4-?-}-] (6) Whenever there is an amendment to this chapter
which, if immediately effective, would change an
employer's rate of contributions, the rate of the
employer shall be changed in accordance with the
amendment and the new rate shall apply for the
remainder of the calendar year beginning with the
calendar quarter immediately following the effective
date of the amendment providing for the change, unless
otherwise provided by the amendment;
[4-84-] (7) For the purposes of this section, "contribution
rate" shall mean the basic contribution rate as
defined in section 383-68 when applied to calendar
year 1978 or any calendar year thereafter; and
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx 26
niiiWHiiiniiiHiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 27
H.B. NO.
[-(-9-)-] (8) For the purposes of this section, the terms
"employing unit", "employer", "predecessor", and
"successor" shall include both the singular and the
plural of each term. Nothing in this section shall
prevent two or more successor employing units, which
each succeed to or acquire a clearly identifiable and
segregable portion of a predecessor employing unit,
from gaining the benefit of the clearly identifiable
and segregable portion of the predecessor's experience
record;
provided that the terms of this section are complied with,
nothing herein shall bar a predecessor employer from waiving the
rights to all or the clearly identifiable and segregable portion
of the predecessor's prior experience record in favor of a
successor employer where the successor acquired a clearly
identifiable and segregable portion of the predecessor's
organization, trade, or business after December 31, 1988 and
fee] before December 31, 1992."
SECTION 7. Section 383-163.6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx 27

Page 28
H.B. NO. S ’
S.D. 2
"(a) An individual filing a new claim for unemployment
compensation shall, at the time of filing the claim, be advised
that:
(1) Unemployment compensation is subject to federal and
state income tax;
(2) Requirements exist pertaining to estimated tax
payments;
(3) The individual may elect to have federal income tax
deducted and withheld from the individual's payment of
unemployment compensation at the amount specified in
the [-fede-rai] Internal Revenue Code [-^] of 1986, as
amended;
(4) The individual may elect to have state income tax
deducted and withheld from the individual's payment of
unemployment compensation at the amount specified in
section 235-69;
(5) The individual may elect to have state and local
income taxes deducted and withheld from the
individual's payment of unemployment compensation for
other states and localities outside [t-hio] tl^ State
at the percentage established by the state or
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx 28

Page 29 H.B. NO. S'
S.D. 2
locality, if the department by agreement with the
other state or locality is authorized to deduct and
withhold income tax; and
(6) The individual shall be permitted to change a
previously elected withholding status [no more than
once] during a benefit year."
SECTION 8. Section 383-12, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
repealed.
[ -- Roquircmont to poot-work availabi-lity online.
To meet the online rcgiotrotie-n—fe-r work requirements under
Goction-383-29(a) ,—the ■ department shall:
-{-id- Allow an- individual to post the required information
iftdepeftdefttl-y—©ft—felie—depar^femeftt-i-s—iftte-rftet—d-efe—
ma-feehiftq—©ysPem-;—©4?
-(-2-)- Ag-eept information—provided by the -i-ndividual in the
-ferfft—preoeeibed—by-^fede—depft-rtffteftpT—and enter the
necessar-y—information on the department's—internet
-job-matching sysfeem-for the individual.
Tho-employment office shall provide the necessary
information to thc' unemployment office for the purpose of
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx 29
MHIOaHIjlllllDIIHilllHI

Page 30 ’S’
H.B. NO. h
S.D. 2
eiotormining whether the individijol' s rogistration for werk
■requiremcnto have boon mot."]
SECTION 9. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 10. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025;
provided that sections 4 and 5 shall take effect upon April 1,
2027.
HB477 SD2 LRB 25-1718.docx 30
nMiinmiiiiHi

H.B. NO.
-1
S.D. 2
APPROVED this 25th day of June , 2025
GOV NOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 477, HD 1, SD 2
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 21, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B.No. 477, H.D. 1,S.D. 2
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 8, 2025
Honolulu, HawaiT 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
1813